Maryland, session 2025, HB0145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Climate Technology Founder’s Fund; [and]
205. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
AND

HOUSE BILL 145 3
206. THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY FOR
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS LOAN FUND.
Article – State Government
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(12) to provide grants through the Customer–Sited Solar Program under §
9–2016 of this title; [and]
(13) TO PROVIDE FUNDS TO THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY
FOR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS LOAN FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–2107 OF
THIS TITLE; AND
[(13)] (14) to pay the expenses of the Program.
SUBTITLE 21. GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY FOR NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS LOAN PROGRAM.
9–2101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ADMINISTRATION” MEANS THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION.
(C) “BORROWER” MEANS A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT APPLIES AND
QUALIFIES FOR A LOAN UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(D) “FUND” MEANS THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY FOR
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS LOAN FUND.
(E) “NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ORGANIZATION THAT IS
EXEMPT FROM FEDERAL INCOME TAX UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE.
(F) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY FOR
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS LOAN PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 145
(G) “QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM” MEANS A SYSTEM THAT:
(1) GENERATES ELECTRICITY OR USABLE THERMAL ENERGY THAT IS
USED TO MEET ON–SITE DEMAND; AND
(2) ASSISTS THE STATE IN MEETING THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND
GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION GOALS UNDER TITLE 2, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
9–2102.
THERE IS A GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY FOR NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS LOAN PROGRAM IN THE ADMINISTRATION.
9–2103.
THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE IN
THE FORM OF NO–INTEREST LOANS TO NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS FOR THE
PLANNING, PURCHASE, AND INSTALLATION OF QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEMS IN
THE STATE.
9–2104.
THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(1) MANAGE, SUPERVISE, AND ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM;
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ENSURE THAT LOANS PROVIDED TO
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS CARRY OUT THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(3) ATTACH TO ANY LOAN SPECIFIC TERMS THAT ARE CONSIDERED
NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS FULFILLED.
9–2105.
(A) (1) A BORROWER MUST FILE AN APPLICATION WITH THE
ADMINISTRATION TO RECEIVE A LOAN UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE APPLICATION MUST BE SIGNED BY THE CHIEF OPERATING
OFFICER OR AN AUTHORIZED OFFICER OF THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION.
(B) THE APPLICATION MUST CONTAIN ANY INFORMATION THE
ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES IS NECESSARY, INCLUDING:
(1) THE PROJECTED COST OF THE QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM OR

HOUSE BILL 145 5
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE BEING FINANCED THROUGH THE LOAN;
(2) THE LOCATION OF THE PROPERTY WHERE THE QUALIFYING
ENERGY SYSTEM WILL BE INSTALLED AND WHETHER THE PROPERTY IS OWNED OR
LEASED BY THE APPLICANT; AND
(3) ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION RELATING TO THE BORROWER OR
THE PROPOSED QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM BEING FINANCED THROUGH THE
LOAN THAT MAY BE REQUIRED BY THE ADMINISTRATION TO ADMINISTER THE
PROGRAM.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY APPROVE AN APPLICATION FOR A LOAN
SPECIFIED IN § 9–2106(A)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE ONLY IF THE APPLICATION
DEMONSTRATES THAT THE PROPOSED QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM IS ESTIMATED,
BASED ON PROJECTED ENERGY COSTS, TO GENERATE ENERGY COST SAVINGS OVER
THE USEFUL LIFE OF THE SYSTEM THAT EQUAL OR EXCEED THE TOTAL AMORTIZED
COST OF THE LOAN.
(D) IN APPROVING AN APPLICATION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL
CONSIDER AND GIVE PRIORITY TO AN APPLICANT THAT HAS AN ANNUAL BUDGET OF
$1,000,000 OR LESS.
9–2106.
(A) LOANS FROM THE FUND MAY BE USED FOR:
(1) THE PURCHASE AND INSTALLATION OF A QUALIFYING ENERGY
SYSTEM, INCLUDING ANY NECESSARY ANCILLARY MACHINERY, EQUIPMENT, OR
FURNISHINGS; AND
(2) TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR THE PLANNING AND INSTALLATION
OF A QUALIFYING ENERGY SYSTEM.
(B) EACH BORROWER FOR A LOAN UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL CONTRIBUTE AT LEAST 10% OF THE COST OF THE QUALIFYING
ENERGY SYSTEM.
(C) (1) LOANS MADE UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL BE REPAYABLE BY
THE BORROWER IN ACCORDANCE WITH A SCHEDULE SET BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(2) THE SCHEDULE SET BY THE ADMINISTRATION MAY BE ON A
DEFERRED PAYMENT BASIS.
(D) (1) A BORROWER SHALL PROVIDE ASSURANCES FOR THE

HOUSE BILL 145
REPAYMENT OF A LOAN.
(2) THE ASSURANCES:
(I) SHALL INCLUDE A PROMISSORY NOTE; AND
(II) MAY INCLUDE A PLAN FOR REPAYMENT.
(E) LOANS MAY BE MADE IN CONJUNCTION WITH OR IN ADDITION TO
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROVIDED THROUGH OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL
PROGRAMS.
9–2107.
(A) THERE IS A GREEN AND RENEWABLE ENERGY FOR NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS LOAN FUND.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(C) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(D) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE PROGRAM;
(2) MONEY TRANSFERRED FROM THE STRATEGIC ENERGY
INVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THIS TITLE;
(3) MONEY RECEIVED FROM ANY PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SOURCE;
(4) INTEREST AND INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(5) REPAYMENTS AND PREPAYMENTS ON LOANS MADE FROM THE
FUND.
(E) (1) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $5,000,000 FOR THE FUND.
(2) IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION EQUAL TO AT LEAST $5,000,000 MINUS
THE AMOUNT IN THE FUND AS OF JUNE 30 OF THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING

HOUSE BILL 145 7
FISCAL YEAR.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY:
(1) TO PAY THE EXPENSES OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) TO PROVIDE LOANS TO ELIGIBLE BORROWERS UNDER THE
PROGRAM.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST AND REINVEST THE
MONEY OF THE FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE
INVESTED.
(2) ANY INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE PAID INTO
THE FUND.
(3) ANY REPAYMENT ON LOANS MADE FROM THE FUND SHALL BE
PAID INTO THE FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, 2026, the
Maryland Energy Administration shall:
(1) establish an application process for loans made under the Green and
Renewable Energy for Nonprofit Organizations Loan Program in Title 9, Subtitle 21 of the
State Government Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act;
(2) set guidelines and considerations for application, selection, and
repayment that include:
(i) nonprofit organizations that own, rather than rent, their
buildings;
(ii) property size and kilowatt–hours of energy used;
(iii) geographic diversity;
(iv) ethnic and racial diversity;
(v) economic diversity;
(vi) nonprofit organization mission diversity;
(vii) access to the borrower’s portion of the cost of the qualifying
energy system; and
(viii) process and frequency of loan repayment; and

HOUSE BILL 145
(3) develop and implement an advertising campaign for the Green and
Renewable Energy for Nonprofit Organizations Loan Program.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.